new_hnd_mo/without_Z_apertium_hn.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXY</alphabet>
<sdefs>

<sdef n="cat:n" c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:p" c="Pronoun"/>
<sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>
<sdef n="cat:adj" c="Adjective"/>
<sdef n="cat:sh" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="cat:prsg" c="parsarg(ViBakwi-PostPosition)"/>
<sdef n="cat:cnj" c="conjunction"/>

<sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>

<sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
<sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
<sdef n="case:Shashthi" c="shashthi"/>

<sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ne" c="ne"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ko" c="ko"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke_liye" c="ke_liye"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke_xvArA" c="ke_xvArA"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>

<sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>

<sdef n="fnum:s" c="following noun singular"/>
<sdef n="fnum:p" c="following noun plural"/>

<sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
<sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h" c="second_honorific"/>
<sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>

<sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>
<sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
<sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
<sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
<sdef n="tam:gA" c="gA"/>
<sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
<sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
<pardef n="parsarg">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prsg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="conjunct">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:cnj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="anek/a__adj">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="amIra/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bAlikA/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bAlaka/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ajAwI/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kAl/A__adj">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>				

<e lm="ko"><i>ko</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="ke liye"><i>ke<b/>liye</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="Oura"><i>Oura</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="aWavA"><i>aWavA</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="acUka"><i>acUka</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aguNavAxI"><i>aguNavAxI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="akarwA"><i>akarw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="akArya"><i>akArya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alagAU"><i>alagAU</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="AlasI"><i>AlasI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alpabuxXi"><i>alpabuxXi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alpAyu"><i>alpAyu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amarxiwa"><i>amarxiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amoGaxqRti"><i>amoGaxqRti</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amqwyu"><i>amqwyu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amUrwi"><i>amUrwi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aMwaraMgI"><i>aMwaraMgI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anabyAhA"><i>anabyAh</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anarGa"><i>anarGa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aneka"><i>anek</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anekAkI"><i>anekAkI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anugawArWa"><i>anugawArWa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anuhAri"><i>anuhAri</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anusArI"><i>anusArI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anuxyamI"><i>anuxyamI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apakqRta"><i>apakqRta</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apawi"><i>apawi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apraBu"><i>apraBu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aprawyakRa"><i>aprawyakRa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apriyavAxI"><i>apriyavAxI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="areNu"><i>areNu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="arjunacCavi"><i>arjunacCavi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asaMKya"><i>asaMKya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ASramI"><i>ASramI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aSvArUDa"><i>aSvArUD</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aTAraha"><i>aTAraha</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avaswu"><i>avaswu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avaXI"><i>avaXI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="AviRta"><i>AviRta</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="awiWiXarmI"><i>awiWiXarmI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="awyaXika"><i>awyaXika</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aXakacarA"><i>aXakacar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ayogI"><i>ayogI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ayoni"><i>ayoni</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Ayukwa"><i>Ayukwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="badI"><i>badI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="baDiyA"><i>baDiyA</i><par n="bAlikA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bAjarU"><i>bAjarU</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bAkI"><i>bAkI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bAlaka"><i>bAlaka</i><par n="bAlaka/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bAlikA"><i>bAlikA</i><par n="bAlikA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="barPIlA"><i>barPIl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="BAvI"><i>BAvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="baxaparaheja"><i>baxaparaheja</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bewukA"><i>bewuk</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="boxXA"><i>boxX</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="BqSa"><i>BqSa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brahmayoni"><i>brahmayoni</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="buxXivAxI"><i>buxXivAxI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="CamaCama"><i>CamaCam</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="capatA"><i>capat</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ciMwAkula"><i>ciMwAkula</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ciwakabarA"><i>ciwakabar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="CotAmotA"><i>CotAmot</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="devaDA"><i>devaD</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ESa"><i>ESa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="EsA"><i>Es</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ewAxqSI"><i>ewAxqSI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gaharA"><i>gahar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gIlI"><i>gIlI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="guNADya"><i>guNADya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halakA"><i>halak</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hawaSrI"><i>hawaSrI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hEMgiMga"><i>hEMgiMga</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="IsavI"><i>IsavI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jaKamI"><i>jaKamI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jiwanA"><i>jiwan</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kaI"><i>kaI</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kAlAkalUtA"><i>kAlAkalUt</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kalamuhAz"><i>kalamuhAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kAmakAjI"><i>kAmakAjI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kApAla"><i>kApAla</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="KArI"><i>KArI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="korA"><i>kor</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kqRijIvI"><i>kqRijIvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kuCa"><i>kuC</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lAdalA"><i>lAdal</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lavaNa"><i>lavaNa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mahawI"><i>mahawI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mahazgI"><i>mahazgI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="manamAnA"><i>manamAn</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mAyAvI"><i>mAyAvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mijAjavAlA"><i>mijAjavAl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="miSriwa"><i>miSriwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mukutaXArI"><i>mukutaXArI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="muzhalagA"><i>muzhalag</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="niruwsAha"><i>niruwsAha</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="niwAMwa"><i>niwAMw</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nOlaKA"><i>nOlaK</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pakRapAwI"><i>pakRapAwI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="PalAz"><i>PalAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="PalAzPalAz"><i>PalAzPalAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parivarjiwa"><i>parivarjiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="paropajIvI"><i>paropajIvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="praharwA"><i>praharw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prapaMcI"><i>prapaMcI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="praSaMsiwa"><i>praSaMsiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ramawA"><i>ramaw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="RatakarNa"><i>RatakarNa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="raWI"><i>raWI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saMjAwa"><i>saMjAwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saMkocakArI"><i>saMkocakArI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sapwajihva"><i>sapwajihva</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sarvesarvA"><i>sarvesarv</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sarvopakArI"><i>sarvopakArI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sIXI"><i>sIXI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="SmaSAnika"><i>SmaSAnika</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ujalA"><i>ujal</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="upalakRya"><i>upalakRya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="upavIwI"><i>upavIwI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vicArajFa"><i>vicArajFa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="viGnakArI"><i>viGnakArI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wrAwA"><i>wrAw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XarmI"><i>XarmI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="xarxamaMxa"><i>xarxamaMxa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
